Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 82. Alaska Stranded Gas Development Act.

Cross references. —

For findings, intent, and nonseverability provisions related to the enactment of this chapter, see §§ 1, 2, and 10, ch. 104, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For Governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of ch. 104, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 393(FIN)) see 1998 House Journal 2281. For letter of intent concerning the enactment of ch. 104, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 393(FIN)), see 1998 Senate Journal 4155.

Opinions of attorney general. —

While Alaska Const., art. IX, § 1 restricts the legislature’s authority from surrendering its power of taxation, it does not prohibit the legislature from suspending or contracting away its power to tax by granting tax exemptions to the sponsors of the Gas Pipeline Project and replacing those taxes with specified payments in lieu of those taxes. 2006 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.